Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 3. Board of Examiners of Speech Pathology and Audiology

§ 33-33-301.
Application for examination. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-396; repealed by 2017 ch. 118, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 33-33-302.
Examination for license. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-397; repealed by 2017 ch. 118, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 33-33-303.
Waiver of examination or parts thereof.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 65, § 2.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the board may waive the examination and grant license to any applicant who shall present proof of current license in another state, including the District of Columbia, or territory of the United States which maintains professional standards considered by the board to be equivalent to those in force in Wyoming. The board shall authorize a privilege to practice by an applicant who is licensed in a member state as provided in the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact provided the applicant’s license meets all the requirements of privilege to practice in other member states as provided in W.S.

33-33-402

.

The board may waive the examination and grant a license to any person certified as clinically competent by a nationally recognized association for speech-language and hearing in the area for which such person is applying for license.

The board may issue a provisional license to practice for twelve (12) months and renewal for one (1) additional period of twelve (12) months, to an applicant who has obtained clinical fellowship year status, subject to the following:

The applicant has completed all requirements for licensure except for the clinical experience requirement;

The applicant has a written agreement with an individual licensed pursuant to this chapter to serve as the applicant’s supervisor for the clinical fellowship year;

The applicant is seeking or has accepted employment in Wyoming as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist; and

During the clinical fellowship year, the applicant continues to meet all other requirements for continued licensure as provided in this chapter and in rules and regulations promulgated by the board, including applicable continuing education requirements.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-398; 2008, ch. 65, §§ 1, 2; 2017 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 128, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, repealed (a) pertaining to waiver of requirements; and added (d).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (c) and (d)(iii), substituted “speech-language” for “speech.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b) added “Except as otherwise provided in this subsection” at the beginning and added the last sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 3, makes the act effective on May 29, 1975.

§ 33-33-304.
Issuance of license.

The board shall issue a license to any person who meets the requirements of this act and who pays to the board the application fee authorized by W.S.

33-33-307

.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-399; 2012, ch. 84, § 201; 2017 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “W.S.

33-33-307

” for “W.S. 33-402.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “the application fee authorized by
W.S.

33-33-307

” for “the initial application and licensing fee prescribed in
W.S.

33-33-307

.”

§ 33-33-305.
Suspension and revocation of license.

The board may after an opportunity for hearing, deny, refuse to renew, suspend or revoke a license or impose probationary conditions upon a licensee for any one (1) of the following:

Obtaining a license by means of fraud, misrepresentation or concealment of material facts;

Being guilty of unprofessional conduct as defined by the rules established by the board, or violating the code of ethics adopted and published by the board;

A plea or verdict of guilty, or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere, made to a criminal charge that relates to the practice of speech-language pathology or audiology or to the ability to practice speech-language pathology or audiology, if the acts committed are found by the board to have a direct bearing on whether he should be entrusted to serve the public in that particular capacity;

Violating any provisions of this act; or

Knowingly submitting false or misleading information to the board.

One (1) year from the date of revocation of a license, an application may be made to the board for reinstatement. The board may accept or reject an application for reinstatement and may require an examination for such reinstatement.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 118, § 2.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

In addition to any other remedies, the board may assess part or all of the costs of the proceeding against a disciplined licensee.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-400; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2017 ch. 118, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, by ch. 118, §
1, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote (a), which formerly read: “The board may refuse to issue or renew a license, or may suspend or revoke a license where the licensee or applicant for license has been guilty of unprofessional conduct which has endangered or is likely to endanger the health, welfare or safety of the public. Such unprofessional conduct may result from”; in (a)(iii), substituted “A plea or verdict of guilty, or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere, made to a criminal charge” for “Being convicted of a felony in any court of the United States” and “committed” for “for which he is convicted”; added (a)(v); in (b), deleted first sentence, which formerly read: “The board may, after hearing, deny an application, or suspend, or revoke a license, or impose probationary conditions upon a licensee”; added (e); and made stylistic and related changes.

The second 2017 amendment, by ch. 118, §
2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (c), which read: “A plea or verdict of guilty, or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere, made to a charge of a felony or of any offense involving moral turpitude, is a conviction within the meaning of this section. At the direction of the board and after due notice and administrative hearing in accordance with the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, the license of the person so convicted shall be suspended or revoked or the board shall decline to issue a license when: (i) The time for appeal has elapsed; (ii) The judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(iii), inserted “that relates to the practice of speech-language pathology or audiology or to the ability to practice speech-language pathology or audiology” following “criminal charge.”

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi) and notes thereto.

§ 33-33-306.
Renewal of license.

Licenses issued under this act expire at midnight December 31 of each year if not renewed.

Every person licensed under this act shall annually, on or before December 31, pay a license renewal fee to the board.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 65, § 2.

Licensees who have allowed their licenses to lapse by failing to renew in accordance with this section may apply for relicensure pursuant to board rules and regulations. Upon satisfying the requirements for relicensure, the board shall issue a renewal of license to practice speech language pathology or audiology

Every person licensed under this act who has not previously undergone a criminal history record background check as provided for by W.S.

7-19-201

shall be required to do so as part of the person’s next license renewal. A previous criminal history record background check that is not available for inspection by the board shall not be considered a background check for purposes of this subsection.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-401; 2008, ch. 65, §§ 1, 2; 2017 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 128, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (b), substituted “this act shall annually, on or before December 31, pay a license renewal fee to the board” for “this act shall, on or before December 31, 1976, and each year thereafter, pay a fee for renewal of license to the board” in the first sentence, substituted “late renewal fee prescribed by the board” for “late renewal payment penalty, which penalty shall equal the amount prescribed by the board and shall not exceed twenty dollars ($20.00)” in the second sentence, substituted “an expired license” for “license, whose license has expired,” in the third sentence, added the last sentence; and repealed former (c) pertaining to failure to renew license.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (b), deleted the second through fourth sentences, which formerly read: “The board may, in the event payment of the renewal fee is rendered after December 31 of any given year, renew a license upon payment of the renewal of license fee plus a late renewal fee prescribed by the board. No person who requests renewal of an expired license shall be required to submit to examination as a condition to renewal if renewal application is made within two (2) years from the date of such expiration. Renewal applications shall include proof that the applicant has complied with any continuing education requirements, as prescribed by rule and regulation of the board, accruing during the time the license was expired”; and added (d).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (e).

§ 33-33-307.
Fees.

The board may prescribe application fees and fees for examination, licensing, certification, specialty examination designation, renewal, a privilege to practice pursuant to the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact and other services in amounts determined by the board.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 118, § 2.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-402; Laws 2017, ch. 118, §§ 1, 2; 2020 ch. 128, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote (a), which formerly read: “The board shall prescribe, and publish in a manner it deems appropriate, fees in amounts determined by the board.”

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 118, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (a)(i) through (v), and (b).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) added “a privilege to practice pursuant to the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact” following “renewal.”

§ 33-33-308.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this act [§§

33-33-101

through

33-33-309

] is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) or imprisoned in the county jail for a period not exceeding six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-403; 2008, ch. 65, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00)” for “one hundred dollars ($100.00).”

§ 33-33-309.
Construction of provisions.

Nothing contained in this act [§§

33-33-101

through

33-33-309

] shall prevent or impair the administration or enforcement of any other provision of the laws of this state.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-404.

Severability. —

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 2, provides: “If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provisions or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are declared severable.”